California statutes. Corporations Code
Unless the provision or the context otherwise indicates, and except as expressly otherwise provided in this chapter, words used in this division have the meanings prescribed in Part 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of the Corporate Securities Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

27001.

As used in this division “security” includes all of the things enumerated in Section 25019 and also includes shares, stock, and investment certificates as defined in the Savings Association Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 458, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

27002.

(a) As used in this division, “individual” includes every natural person, domestic or foreign private corporation, nonprofit corporation, unincorporated association, company, partnership of whatever kind, syndicate, joint stock company, trustee, protective committee, depositors’ league, and other similar organization however described.

(b) As used in this division, “individual” does not include any of the following persons:

(1) Any licensed practicing attorney rendering or performing services in connection with the practice of law.

(2) Any person holding a broker-dealer’s or investment adviser’s certificate then in effect issued by the commissioner, rendering or performing services as such.

(3) Any holder of a permit then in effect, granted by the commissioner under the Corporate Securities Law, permitting the issue of certificates of deposit.

(4) Any securities depository as defined in Section 30004 of the Financial Code, which is licensed under Section 30200 of the Financial Code or exempted from licensing thereunder by Section 30005 or 30006 of the Financial Code.

(5) Any broker licensed by the Real Estate Commissioner of this state rendering or performing services with respect to securities, if the person would not be subject to the broker-dealer certification requirements for effecting transactions in the securities.

(6) Any security owner or holder who, without compensation of any kind, induces or attempts to induce, other security holders or owners of the same issuer into entering into agreements with persons who are excluded from “individual” by virtue of paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 458, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

27003.

If any provision of this division, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of this division, or the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 27007 by Stats. 1996, Ch. 458, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Unlawful and Fraudulent Conduct [27100. - 27101.]

27100.

Any individual who, within this state, solicits, receives, collects, or solicits any subscription or contract to pay, any contributions, fees, funds, or compensation of any kind, from any owner or holder of any security, for the purpose of protecting, enforcing, or representing the rights of the security owners or holders evidenced by the security, shall be subject to the provisions of this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 458, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

27101.

It is unlawful for any individual, directly or indirectly, in connection with the solicitation, receipt, or collection of, or solicitation of any subscription or contract to pay any contributions, fees, funds, or compensation of any kind, from any owner or holder of any security, for the purpose of protecting, enforcing, or representing the rights of the security owners or holders evidenced by the security, to do any of the following:

(a) Employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud.

(b) By means of any written or oral communication, make any untrue statement of a material fact, or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.

(c) Engage in any transaction, act, practice, or course of business which operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon any person.

(d) Misappropriate or convert the funds, security, or property of any other person.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 458, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Civil Liability and Crimes [27200. - 27202.]

27200.

Every individual who solicits, receives, collects, or contracts for the payment of, any contributions, fees, funds, or compensation of any kind, in violation of this division, is civilly liable for the return of the full amount of that contribution, fee, or fund, together with reasonable attorney’s fees. This liability is both joint and several.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 458, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

27201.

No action shall be maintained to enforce any liability created under Section 27200 unless brought before the expiration of two years after the violation upon which it is based or the expiration of one year after the discovery by the plaintiff of the facts constituting the violation, whichever shall first expire.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 27200.1 by Stats. 1996, Ch. 458, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

27202.

Every individual who willfully violates Section 27101 is guilty of a public offense punishable by a fine not exceeding two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, three, or four years, or by both fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 49.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



DIVISION 2.5. Fair Investment Practices by Venture Capital Companies [27500. - 27506.]



  CHAPTER 1. Fair Investment Practices by Venture Capital Companies [27500. - 27506.]

27500.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(b) “Covered entity” means a venture capital company that meets both of the following criteria:

(1) The venture capital company primarily engages in the business of investing in, or providing financing to, startup, early-stage, or emerging growth companies.

(2) The venture capital company meets any of the following criteria:

(A) The venture capital company is
 headquartered in California.

(B) The venture capital company has a significant presence or operational office in California.

(C) The venture capital company makes venture capital investments in businesses that are located in, or have significant operations in, California.

(D) The venture capital company solicits or receives investments from a person who is a resident of California.

(c) “Department” means the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(d) “Diverse founding team member” means a founding team member who self-identifies as a woman, nonbinary, Black, African American, Hispanic, Latino-Latina, Asian, Pacific Islander, Native American, Native Hawaiian, Alaskan Native,
 disabled, veteran or disabled veteran, lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, or queer.

(e) “Founding team member” means either of the following:

(1) A person who satisfies all of the following conditions:

(A) The person owned initial shares or similar ownership interests of the business.

(B) The person contributed to the concept of, research for, development of, or work performed by the business before initial shares were issued.

(C) The person was not a passive investor in the business.

(2) A person who has been designated as the chief executive officer or president.

(f) “Primarily founded by diverse founding team members” means a founding team for which more than one-half of the founding team members responded to the survey described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 27501 and at least one-half of the founding team members are diverse founding team members.

(g) “Venture capital company” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 260.204.9 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(h) “Venture capital investment” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 260.204.9 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 21.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

27501.

(a) (1) Commencing March 1, 2026, a covered entity shall submit to the department the following information in a manner prescribed by the department:

(A) The name of the covered entity.

(B) The name, title, and email address of the person who serves as the designated point of contact for the covered entity.

(C) The designated email address, telephone number, physical address, and internet website of the covered entity.

(2) The covered entity shall keep the information provided under paragraph (1) updated by submitting any changes
 to that information when filing the report required by subdivision (b).

(3) (A) If a covered entity fails to update the information provided under paragraph (1) in the report required by subdivision (b) by April 1 of any year, the department shall notify the covered entity that the covered entity has 60 calendar days from the date of the notification to submit the updated information without penalty.

(B) If a covered entity has not submitted the updated information after the 60-day period described in subparagraph (A) has elapsed, the department may pursue any remedy provided under this chapter.

(b) By April 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, a covered entity shall report to the department all of the following information about its funding determinations:

(1) At an aggregated level, all of the following information for the founding teams of all of the businesses in which the covered entity made a venture capital investment in the prior calendar year to the extent the information was provided pursuant to the survey described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c):

(A) The gender identity of each member of the founding team, including nonbinary and gender-fluid identities.

(B) The race of each member of the founding team.

(C) The ethnicity of each member of the founding team.

(D) The disability status of each member of the founding team.

(E) Whether any member of the founding team
 identifies as LGBTQ+.

(F) Whether any member of the founding team is a veteran or a disabled veteran.

(G) Whether any member of the founding team is a resident of California.

(H) Whether any member of the founding team declined to provide any of the information described in subparagraphs (A) to (G), inclusive.

(2) (A) During the prior calendar year, the number of venture capital investments to businesses primarily founded by diverse founding team members, as a percentage of the total number of venture capital investments the covered entity made, in the aggregate and broken down into the categories described in subparagraphs (A) to (H), inclusive, of paragraph (1).

(B) The information provided pursuant to this subparagraph shall be anonymized to the extent possible.

(3) During the prior calendar year, the total amount of venture capital investments to businesses primarily founded by diverse founding team members, as a percentage of venture capital investments made by the covered entity, in the aggregate and broken down into the categories described in subparagraphs (A) to (H), inclusive, of paragraph (1).

(4) The total amount of money in venture capital investments the covered entity invested in each business during the prior calendar year.

(5) The principal place of business of each company in which the covered entity made a venture capital investment during the prior calendar year.

(c) (1) A covered entity shall obtain the information required by subdivision (b) by providing each founding team member of a business that has received funding from a covered entity with an opportunity to participate in a survey for the purpose of collecting the information.

(2) The survey described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall be provided pursuant to a standardized form specified by the department. The survey shall include a “decline to state” option for each question on the survey.

(3) A covered entity shall provide a written disclosure to each founding team member prior to, or concurrently with, the survey described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) that states all of the following:

(A) The founding team member’s decision to disclose their demographic information is voluntary.

(B) No adverse action will be taken against the founding team member if they decline to participate in the survey.

(C) The aggregate data collected for each demographic category will be reported to the department.

(4) A covered entity shall not provide the survey described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) and the disclosure described in paragraph (3) to a founding team member until after the covered entity has executed an investment agreement with the business and made the first transfer of funds.

(5) Neither a covered entity nor the department shall in any way encourage, incentivize, or attempt to influence the decision of a founding team member to participate in the survey described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(d) A covered entity required to conduct the survey described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) shall do both of the following:

(1) Collect survey response data from the founding team members in a manner that does not associate the survey response data with an individual founding team member.

(2) Report the survey response data pursuant to paragraph (1) in a manner that does not associate the survey response data with an individual founding team member.

(3) A covered entity may satisfy the requirements of this chapter by providing a report prepared by a business that controls each covered entity at any time during the prior calendar year if the report contains all of the information required by subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 21.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

27502.

(a) (1) The department shall make the reports received pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 27501 readily accessible, easily searchable, and easily downloadable on the department’s internet website.

(2) The department may publish aggregate results or aggregate information based on the information received pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The department may use any information collected pursuant to this chapter in furtherance of its statutory duties, including, but not limited to, using the information in a civil action brought by the department under this chapter or other law.

(c) (1) A covered entity shall make and keep records related to its obligation under this chapter. All records related to a report delivered to the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 27501 shall be preserved for at least five years after the covered entity delivers the report.

(2) The commissioner may examine the records of a covered entity to determine their compliance with this chapter using powers set forth in Sections 11180 to 11191, inclusive, of the Government Code and may further require a covered entity to do either of the following:

(A) Produce documentary material for inspection and copying or reproduce in the form or medium requested by the department.

(B) File written reports or answers to questions.

(d) The
 department shall charge and collect fees from covered entities to cover the expenses incurred in the administration of this chapter, not to exceed the reasonable costs of that administration.

(1) The fee per report shall be at least one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175).

(2) The department may adjust this fee as necessary to meet the reasonable costs of administration.

(e) (1) If a covered entity fails to file a report required by subdivision (b) of Section 27501 by April 1 of any year, the department shall notify the covered entity that the covered entity has 60 calendar days from the date of the notification to submit the report without penalty.

(2) If a covered entity has not submitted a report after the 60 calendar days
 described in paragraph (1) has elapsed, the department may pursue all remedies provided under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 21.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

27503.

With respect to the investigative powers of the commissioner under this chapter, the commissioner may do the following at their discretion:

(a) Make public or private investigations within or outside of this state as they deem necessary to determine whether a covered entity has violated or is about to violate any provision of this chapter, any rule or order pursuant to this chapter or to aid in the enforcement of this chapter in the prescribing of rules and forms pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Publish information concerning any violations of this chapter or of any rule or order pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 21.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

27504.

(a) With respect to the enforcement powers of the commissioner and the department under this chapter, all of the following apply:

(1) The commissioner may take any action authorized by this chapter against a covered entity who fails to meet the requirements of Section 27501 or who makes an untrue statement of a material fact in any report filed with the department.

(2) Relief under this chapter may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(A) An order requiring the covered entity to desist and refrain from the violation.

(B) An order
 requiring costs, representing reasonable attorney’s fees and investigative expenses for the services rendered, for deposit into the Financial Protection Fund for use by the department.

(C) An order requiring the payment of monetary penalties, as set forth by subdivision (b).

(b) (1) In any civil or administrative action brought pursuant to this chapter in which the commissioner orders penalties, the following penalty amounts apply:

(A) For any violation of this chapter, rule or final order pursuant to this chapter, or condition imposed in writing by the department, a penalty shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day during which the violation or failure to pay continues.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for
 any reckless violation by a covered entity subject to this chapter, rule or final order pursuant to this chapter, or condition imposed by the department, a penalty that is sufficient to deter the covered entity from failing to comply with this chapter as determined by the commissioner under paragraph (2), and exceeds the penalty amount provided in subparagraph (A) for each day during which the violation continues.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A) or (B), for any knowing violation by a covered entity subject to this chapter, rule or final order pursuant to this chapter, or condition imposed by the department, a penalty that is sufficient to deter the covered entity from failing to comply with this chapter as determined by the commissioner under paragraph (2), and exceeds the penalty amount provided in subparagraph (B) for each day during which the violation continues.

(2) In
 determining the amount of any penalty ordered under this chapter, the commissioner shall take into account mitigating factors and the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to all of the following:

(A) The financial standing of the covered entity.

(B) The number of assets under management by the covered entity.

(C) The nature of the covered entity’s failure to comply with this chapter.

(D) The amount of financial resources available to the covered entity.

(E) The covered entity’s history of previous violations.

(3) The commissioner may compromise, modify, or remit any penalty that may be ordered or that has already been
 ordered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 21.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

27505.

(a) (1) If, after an order has been served pursuant to Section 27504, a request for hearing is filed in writing within 30 days of the date of service of the order on the covered entity, a hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and the commissioner shall have all of the powers granted under that chapter.

(2) If a covered entity fails to file a written request for a hearing within 30 days from the date of service of the order, the order shall be deemed a final order of the commissioner and is not subject to review by any court or agency, notwithstanding subdivision (b).

(b) Every final order, decision, or other official act of the commissioner is subject to judicial review in accordance with law.

(c) The commissioner may file a certified copy of the final order with the clerk of the superior court or any court of competent jurisdiction. The final order filed has the same effect as a judgment of the court and may be recorded, enforced, or satisfied in the same manner as a judgment of the court.

(d) (1) If a covered entity does not comply with an order under this chapter, the commissioner may petition the superior court or any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce the order.

(2) The court shall not require the commissioner to post a bond in an action or proceeding under this chapter.

(3) If the court finds, after service and opportunity for hearing, that the covered entity was not in compliance with the order, the court may adjudge the covered entity in civil contempt of the order. The court may impose a further civil penalty against the covered entity for contempt and may grant any other relief the court determines is just and proper under the circumstances.

(e) When a covered entity, including a nonresident of this state, engages in conduct prohibited or made actionable by this chapter or any rule or order pursuant to this chapter, whether or not the covered entity has filed a consent to service of process, and personal jurisdiction over the covered entity cannot otherwise be obtained in this state, that conduct shall be considered equivalent to the covered entity’s appointment of the commissioner or the commissioner’s successor in office to be the covered
 entity’s attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal suit, action, or proceeding against the covered entity or the covered entity’s successor, executor, or administrator that grows out of that conduct and that is brought under this chapter or any rule or order pursuant to this chapter, with the same force and validity as if served on the covered entity personally. Service may be made by leaving a copy of the process in the office of the commissioner, but it is not in effect unless the following conditions are met:

(1) The plaintiff, who may be the commissioner in a suit, action, or proceeding instituted by commissioner, sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered or certified mail to the covered entity at the covered entity’s last known address or take other steps that are reasonably calculated to give actual notice.

(2) The
 plaintiff’s affidavit of compliance with this chapter is filed in the case on or before the return day of the process, if any, or within such further time as the court allows.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 21.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

27506.

(a) The commissioner may make, amend, and rescind any rules, forms, and orders as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, including rules and forms governing applications and reports, and defining any terms, whether or not used in this chapter, insofar as the definitions are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

(b) Moneys collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Financial Protection Fund established pursuant to Section 12895 of the Government Code. It is the intent of the Legislature that the moneys collected pursuant to this chapter be appropriated in the annual Budget Act to the department for administration of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 21.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



DIVISION 3. CAPITAL ACCESS COMPANIES [28000. - 28958.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [28000. - 28049.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title and Construction [28000. - 28004.]

28000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the “Capital Access Company Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28001.

This division shall be liberally construed to accomplish its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28002.

The provisions of the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 (Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Title 4) shall apply to licensees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28003.

The Legislature finds all of the following:

(a) It is necessary to increase job opportunities in the state.

(b) Promoting the establishment, growth, and expansion of small business firms in this state is an efficient way to increase job opportunities in the state.

(c) Small business firms are unable to grow and create job opportunities unless they have access to risk capital.

(d) Congress has exempted from the provisions of the federal Investment Company Act of 1940, certain companies that are not in the business of issuing redeemable securities, the operations of which are subject to state regulation governing entities that provide financial or managerial assistance to enterprises doing business, or proposing to do business, in that state.

(e) Therefore, in order for the state to obtain the full benefits of that exemption, it is necessary that the state provide for the licensure and regulation of capital access companies, to permit these companies to operate pursuant to the exemption from regulation under the federal Investment Company Act of 1940.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28004.

(a) The purpose of this division is to provide for the licensure and regulation of capital access companies that will provide risk capital and management assistance, primarily to small business firms in the state, to enable those companies to operate pursuant to the exemption from regulation under the federal Investment Company Act of 1940.

(b) The purpose of this division as set forth in subdivision (a) constitutes the standard that the commissioner shall observe in administering the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [28030. - 28049.]

28030.

Subject to additional definitions contained in this division which are applicable to specific provisions of this division, and unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article apply throughout this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28031.

“Accredited investor” means a person who is defined in Section 2(a)(15) of the Securities Act of 1933, or any other person that the Securities and Exchange Commission may so designate by rule, regulation, or order, who, by purchasing the securities of a licensee, provides the investment funds with which the licensee will provide financial assistance to small business firms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28032.

“Affiliate” means any person or persons controlling, controlled by, or under common control with, other specified persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28033.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation or their designee with respect to a particular matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 86.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

28034.

“Company” means a corporation, limited partnership, limited liability company, or other form of business entity, which is organized under the laws of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28035.

“Control” means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a specified person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28036.

“Controlling person,” when used with respect to a specified person, means any person who controls the specified person, directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28037.

“Insolvent,” when used with respect to any person, means a person who has ceased to pay his or her debts in the ordinary course of business, who cannot pay his or her debts as they become due, or whose liabilities exceed his or her assets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28038.

“License” means a license issued under this division authorizing a licensee to transact business as a capital access company.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28039.

“Licensee” means a company that is licensed under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28040.

“Officer” means either of the following:

(a) When used with respect to a corporation, any person appointed or designated as an officer of the corporation by or pursuant to applicable law or the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation or any person who performs with respect to the corporation functions usually performed by an officer of a corporation.

(b) When used with respect to a specified person other than a natural person or a corporation, any person who performs with respect to the specified person functions usually performed by an officer of a corporation with respect to the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28041.

“Order” means any approval, consent, authorization, exemption, denial, prohibition, or requirement applicable to a specific case issued by the commissioner. “Order” includes any condition of a license and any agreement made by any person with the commissioner under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28042.

“Parent,” when used with respect to a specified person other than a natural person, means any person other than a natural person that controls the specified person, directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28043.

“Person” means any natural person, proprietorship, joint venture, partnership, trust, business trust, syndicate, association, joint stock company, corporation, limited liability company, government, agency of any government, or any other organization. However, “person,” when used with respect to acquiring control of or controlling a specified person, includes any combination of two or more persons acting in concert.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28044.

“Principal security holder,” means any person who owns, directly or indirectly, of record or beneficially, securities representing 10 percent or more of the voting power of the issuer of those securities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28045.

“To provide financing assistance to a person” means to purchase securities issued by the person, either directly from the person, or indirectly through a securities underwriter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28046.

“Security” has the meaning set forth in Section 25019.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28047.

“Small business firm” means a person that proposes to transact, or transacts, business on a regular and continuous basis in California and, together with its affiliates, has a net worth of not more than eighteen million dollars ($18,000,000) and average net income after federal income taxes, excluding any carryover losses, for the preceding two years no greater than six million dollars ($6,000,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 516, Sec. 2.   (SB 1155)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

28047.1.

“Smaller business firm” means a person that proposes to transact, or transacts, business on a regular and continuous basis in California and, together with its affiliates, has a net worth of not more than six million dollars ($6,000,000), and average net income after federal income taxes, excluding any carryover losses, for the preceding two years no greater than two million dollars ($2,000,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 516, Sec. 3.   (SB 1155)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

28048.

“Subsidiary,” when used with respect to a specified person other than a natural person, means any person other than a natural person controlled by the specified person, directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28049.

“Voting power” has the meaning set forth in Section 194.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Administration [28100. - 28111.]

28100.

The commissioner shall administer and enforce the provisions of this division in a manner that facilitates the legislative purposes set forth in Section 28004, consistent with protection of investors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 516, Sec. 4.   (SB 1155)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

28101.

Whenever the commissioner issues an order or license under this division, the commissioner may impose any conditions that are in his or her opinion necessary to carry out the provisions and purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28102.

Any application filed with the commissioner under this division or under any regulation or order issued under this division shall be in a form, shall contain information, shall be signed in a manner, and shall be verified in a manner, that the commissioner may by regulation or order require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28103.

In determining whether to approve any application filed under this division or under any regulation or order issued under this division, the commissioner may consider proposals made by the applicant, including, but not limited to, proposals to appoint officers, sell securities, obtain financing, or purchase securities of small business firms, and, if in the opinion of the commissioner it is probable that the applicant will be able to implement the proposal, the commissioner may make findings on the basis of the proposal. However, whenever the commissioner approves an application on the basis, in whole or in part, of a proposal made by the applicant, the commissioner shall impose upon the approval appropriate conditions requiring that the applicant implement the proposal within a period of time specified by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 668.)
-------------------------------------------

28104.

(a) The commissioner may do both of the following:

(1) Make public or private investigations within or outside this state that he or she deems necessary to determine whether to approve any application filed under this division or under any regulation or order issued under this division, to determine whether any person has violated or may violate any provision of this division or of any regulation or order issued under this division, to aid in the enforcement of any provision of this division or of any regulation or order issued under this division, or to aid in the issuing of regulations or orders under this division.

(2) Publish information concerning any violation of any provision of this division or of any regulation or order issued under this division.
